Nebraska, session 109, LB1115.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1115 LB1115
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 53-201, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-201 The purpose of sections 53-201 to 53-223 and section 3 of
this act is to provide fair, efficient, and competitive distribution of
beer by (1) regulating the termination, expiration, and renewal of
distribution agreements between beer suppliers and beer wholesalers, (2)
promoting a distribution system in which each beer wholesaler will devote
reasonable efforts and resources to sales, distribution, and quality
control of the beer it sells, (3) promoting the continued availability of
good quality beer for the consumers of Nebraska through orderly marketing
and vigorous interbrand competition, (4) preventing a beer supplier from
unfairly depriving a beer wholesaler of the value of the investment the
wholesaler made in its business in terms of money, time, effort, and
skill, and (5) controlling the sale of malt beverages in this state and
facilitating the lawful and orderly marketing of malt beverages pursuant
to the police powers of this state.
Sec. 2. Section 53-202, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-202 For purposes of sections 53-201 to 53-223 and section 3 of
this act, the definitions found in sections 53-203 to 53-215 shall be
used.
Sec. 3. (1) Sections 53-201 to 53-223 shall not apply to any
agreement entered into, amended, or renewed on or after the operative
date of this act between a microbrewery as defined in section 53-103.21
and a wholesaler.
(2) Any agreement between a microbrewery as defined in section
53-103.21 and a wholesaler that is in existence prior to the operative
date of this act and that is continuous in nature or that has no specific
duration or renewal provision shall be deemed terminated on October 1,
2027, unless the parties enter into a new written agreement prior to such
date. Such new written agreement shall be subject to subsection (1) of
-2-

LB1115 LB1115
2026 2026
this section.
Sec. 4. Section 53-213, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-213 Supplier shall mean a manufacturer or importer of beer
licensed by the State of Nebraska. Supplier does not include a
microbrewery as defined in section 53-103.21.
Sec. 5. Section 53-216, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-216 A supplier shall not:
(1) Fail to provide each wholesaler of the supplier's brand or
brands with a written agreement which contains the entire agreement with
the wholesaler and designates a specific, exclusive sales territory. Any
agreement which is in existence on April 18, 1989, shall be renewed in a
manner consistent with sections 53-201 to 53-223 and section 3 of this
act, and the provisions of such sections may be incorporated by reference
in the agreement. Nothing in such sections shall prevent a supplier from
making a one-time appointment, for a period not to exceed ninety days, of
a wholesaler to temporarily service a sales territory not designated to
another wholesaler until such time as a wholesaler is appointed by the
supplier. The wholesaler who is designated to service the sales territory
during the period of temporary service shall not be in violation of such
sections and, with respect to the temporary sales territory, shall not
have any of the rights provided under sections 53-218 and 53-220. The
temporary service period may be extended beyond ninety days by the
Nebraska Liquor Control Commission if justifiable circumstances exist as
determined by the commission;
(2) Fix, maintain, establish, or unduly influence the price at which
a wholesaler shall be required to sell any beer;
(3) Enter into an additional agreement with any other wholesaler for
or to sell to any other wholesaler the same brand or brands of beer in
the same sales territory or any portion thereof or to sell directly to
-3-

LB1115 LB1115
2026 2026
any retailer in this state;
(4) Coerce or attempt to coerce any wholesaler to accept delivery of
any beer or other commodity which has not been ordered by the wholesaler,
except that a supplier may impose reasonable inventory requirements upon
a wholesaler if the requirements are made in good faith and are generally
applied to other similarly situated Nebraska wholesalers having an
agreement with the supplier;
(5) Coerce or attempt to coerce any wholesaler to accept delivery of
any beer or other commodity ordered by a wholesaler if the order was
canceled by the wholesaler in accordance with acceptable procedures;
(6) Coerce or attempt to coerce any wholesaler to do any illegal act
or to violate any law, rule, or regulation by threatening to amend,
modify, cancel, terminate, or refuse to renew any agreement existing
between the supplier and wholesaler;
(7) Require a wholesaler to assent to any condition, stipulation, or
provision limiting the wholesaler's right to sell the brand or brands of
beer or other products of any other supplier unless the acquisition of
the brand or brands or products of another supplier would materially
impair or adversely affect the wholesaler's quality of service, sales, or
ability to compete effectively in representing the brand or brands of the
supplier presently being sold by the wholesaler. The supplier shall have
the burden of proving that such acquisition of such other brand or brands
or products would have such effect;
(8) Require a wholesaler to purchase one or more brands of beer or
other products in order for the wholesaler to purchase another brand or
brands of beer for any reason. A wholesaler that has agreed to distribute
a brand or brands before April 18, 1989, shall continue to distribute the
brand or brands in conformance with sections 53-201 to 53-223 and section
3 of this act;
(9) Require a wholesaler to submit audited profit and loss
statements, audited balance sheets, or audited financial records as a
-4-

LB1115 LB1115
2026 2026
condition of renewal or continuation of an agreement. A supplier may
require profit and loss statements, balance sheets, or financial records
which are certified by the wholesaler or an officer thereof;
(10) Coerce, compel, or require a wholesaler to provide or divulge
specific information regarding the wholesaler's individual accounts or
customers or his or her exclusive relationship with them or coerce,
compel, or require a wholesaler to provide specific information
concerning competitive brands;
(11) Use the threat of losing or withholding its credit as a means
of compelling a wholesaler to standards of performance in any area of
business except that area directly relating to credit;
(12) Withhold delivery of beer ordered by a wholesaler or change a
wholesaler's quota of a brand or brands if the withholding or change is
not made in good faith;
(13) Require a wholesaler by any means directly to participate in or
contribute to any local or national advertising fund controlled, directly
or indirectly, by a supplier;
(14) Willfully discriminate, directly or indirectly, in price,
programs, or terms of sale offered to franchisees if the effect of such
discrimination may be to substantially lessen competition or to give to
one holder of a franchise any economic, business, or competitive
advantage not offered to all holders of the same or similar franchise.
This subdivision shall not govern dock prices;
(15) Take any action against a wholesaler who files a complaint
regarding an alleged violation by the supplier of a federal, state, or
local law, rule, or regulation in retaliation for such complaint;
(16) Restrict or inhibit, directly or indirectly, the right of free
association among wholesalers for any lawful purpose;
(17) Require or prohibit, without just cause, any change in the
manager or successor manager of any wholesaler who has been approved by
the supplier as of or subsequent to April 18, 1989. If a wholesaler
-5-

LB1115 LB1115
2026 2026
changes an approved manager or successor manager, a supplier shall not
require or prohibit the change unless the person selected by the
wholesaler fails to meet the reasonable qualifications for managers of
Nebraska wholesalers of the supplier, which reasonable qualifications
previously have been consistently applied to similarly situated Nebraska
wholesalers by the supplier. The supplier shall have the burden of
proving that such person fails to meet such reasonable qualifications and
that the qualifications have been consistently applied to similarly
situated Nebraska wholesalers;
(18) Upon written notice of intent to transfer the wholesaler's
business, interfere with, prevent, or unreasonably delay for a period of
sixty days or more the transfer of the wholesaler's business if the
proposed transferee is a designated member; or
(19) Upon written notice of intent to transfer the wholesaler's
business other than to a designated member, withhold consent to or
approval of, or unreasonably delay for a period of sixty days or more
after receipt of all material information reasonably requested of the
wholesaler a response to a request by the wholesaler for, any transfer of
a wholesaler's business if the proposed transferee meets the reasonable
qualifications required by the supplier for similarly situated Nebraska
wholesalers. The supplier shall have the burden of proving that the
proposed transferee fails to meet such reasonable qualifications and that
the qualifications have been consistently applied to similarly situated
Nebraska wholesalers.
Sec. 6. Section 53-217, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-217 A wholesaler shall not:
(1) Fail to devote such efforts as are required in the agreement
between the supplier and wholesaler within the supplier's designated
sales territory relating to the sale and distribution of the supplier's
brand or brands of beer which the wholesaler has been granted the right
-6-

LB1115 LB1115
2026 2026
to sell or distribute;
(2) Sell or deliver beer to a retail licensee located outside the
sales territory designated to the wholesaler by the supplier of a
particular brand or brands of beer, except that during a period of
temporary service interruption impacting a particular sales territory, a
wholesaler who normally services the impacted sales territory shall file
with the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission and give to the affected
supplier written notice designating the specific wholesaler or
wholesalers, not disapproved by the supplier, who will service the sales
territory during the period of temporary service interruption and the
approximate length of time of the service interruption. Each wholesaler
designated to temporarily service a sales territory shall be a wholesaler
who has a current agreement with a supplier for the brand or brands
affected. When the temporary service interruption is over, the wholesaler
who normally services the sales territory shall notify the commission,
the supplier, and the wholesaler or wholesalers servicing the sales
territory on a temporary basis of this fact in writing, and any
wholesaler servicing the sales territory on a temporary basis shall cease
servicing the sales territory upon receipt of the notice. A wholesaler
who is designated to service a sales territory during a period of
temporary service shall not be in violation of sections 53-201 to 53-223
and section 3 of this act and, with respect to the sales territory, shall
not have any of the rights provided under sections 53-218 and 53-220; or
(3) Transfer his or her business without giving the supplier written
notice of intent to transfer the business and, when required by sections
53-201 to 53-223 and section 3 of this act, receiving the supplier's
approval for the proposed transfer. Consent or approval from the supplier
shall not be required for any transfer of the wholesaler's business to a
designated member or any transfer of less than control of the
wholesaler's business. The wholesaler shall give the supplier written
notice of any change in ownership of the wholesaler.
-7-

LB1115 LB1115
2026 2026
Sec. 7. Section 53-218, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-218 (1) Notwithstanding any agreement and except as otherwise
provided for in sections 53-201 to 53-223 and section 3 of this act, a
supplier shall not amend or modify an agreement, cause a wholesaler to
resign from an agreement, or cancel, terminate, fail to renew, or refuse
to continue under an agreement unless the supplier has:
(a) Satisfied the applicable notice requirements of subsection (3)
of this section;
(b) Acted in good faith; and
(c) Good cause for the amendment, modification, forced resignation,
cancellation, termination, nonrenewal, or discontinuance.
(2) For each amendment, modification, cancellation, termination,
nonrenewal, or discontinuance, the supplier shall have the burden of
proving that it has acted in good faith, that the notice requirements
under this section have been complied with, and that there was good cause
for the amendment, modification, cancellation, termination, nonrenewal,
or discontinuance.
(3) Notwithstanding any agreement and except as to new products and
as otherwise provided in this section and in addition to the time limits
set forth in subdivision (4)(e) of this section, the supplier shall
furnish written notice of the amendment, modification, cancellation,
termination, nonrenewal, or discontinuance of an agreement to the
wholesaler not less than thirty days before the effective date of the
amendment, modification, cancellation, termination, nonrenewal, or
discontinuance. The notice shall be sent by certified mail and shall
contain:
(a) A statement of intention to amend, modify, cancel, terminate,
not renew, or discontinue the agreement;
(b) A statement of the reason for the amendment, modification,
cancellation, termination, nonrenewal, or discontinuance; and
-8-

LB1115 LB1115
2026 2026
(c) The date on which the amendment, modification, cancellation,
termination, nonrenewal, or discontinuance shall take effect.
(4) Notwithstanding any agreement, good cause shall exist for the
purposes of a cancellation, termination, nonrenewal, or discontinuance
under subdivision (1)(c) of this section when:
(a) There is a failure by the wholesaler to comply with a provision
of the agreement which is both reasonable and of material significance to
the business relationship between the wholesaler and the supplier;
(b) The supplier first acquired knowledge of the failure described
in subdivision (a) of this subsection not more than twenty-four months
before the date notification was given pursuant to subsection (3) of this
section;
(c) The wholesaler was given notice by the supplier of failure to
comply with the agreement within twenty-four months of such failure;
(d) The wholesaler was afforded a reasonable opportunity to assert
good faith efforts to comply with the agreement within the time limits
provided for in subdivision (e) of this subsection; and
(e) The wholesaler has been afforded thirty days in which to submit
a plan of corrective action to comply with the agreement and an
additional ninety days to cure such noncompliance in accordance with the
plan.
(5) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (3) of this section, a
supplier may cancel, terminate, fail to renew, or discontinue an
agreement immediately upon written notice given in the manner and
containing the information required by subsection (3) of this section if:
(a) The wholesaler becomes insolvent, files or has filed against it
a petition under any bankruptcy or receivership law, makes an assignment
for the benefit of creditors, or is dissolved or liquidated and such
action materially affects the wholesaler's ability to remain in business;
(b) The wholesaler's state or federal license is revoked or
suspended by the appropriate regulatory agency and the wholesaler cannot
-9-

LB1115 LB1115
2026 2026
service the wholesaler's sales territory for more than sixty-one days;
(c) The wholesaler or a partner, a member, or an individual who owns
ten percent or more of the partnership, the limited liability company, or
the stock of a corporate wholesaler has been convicted of a felony under
the United States Code or the laws of any state which reasonably may
adversely affect the goodwill or interest of the wholesaler or supplier.
An existing stockholder, partner, or member or a designated member shall
have, subject to the provisions of sections 53-201 to 53-223 and section
3 of this act, the right to purchase the partnership interest, the
limited liability company member interest, or the stock of the offending
partner or stockholder, and if the sale is completed prior to conviction,
the provisions of this subdivision shall not apply; or
(d) The supplier and wholesaler agree to a termination.
(6) Notwithstanding subsections (1), (3), and (4) of this section,
upon not less than fifteen days' written notice given in the manner and
containing the information required by subsection (3) of this section, a
supplier may cancel, terminate, fail to renew, or discontinue an
agreement if:
(a) There was intentional fraudulent conduct relating to a material
matter on the part of the wholesaler in dealings with the supplier or its
producers. The supplier shall have the burden of proving intentional
fraudulent conduct relating to a material matter on the part of the
wholesaler;
(b) The wholesaler failed to confine its sales of a brand or brands
to retailers in its designated sales territory. This subdivision shall
not apply if there is a dispute between two or more wholesalers as to the
boundaries of the assigned territory and the boundaries cannot be
determined by a reading of the description contained in the agreements
between the supplier and the wholesalers;
(c) A wholesaler who has failed to pay for beer ordered and
delivered in accordance with established terms with the supplier fails to
-10-

LB1115 LB1115
2026 2026
make full payment within two business days after receipt of written
notice of the delinquency and demand for immediate payment from the
supplier;
(d) A wholesaler intentionally has made a transfer of the
wholesaler's business, other than a transfer to a designated member or
pursuant to a loan agreement or debt instrument, without prior written
notice to the supplier and has failed, within thirty days from the
receipt of written notice from the supplier of its intent to terminate on
the ground of such transfer, to reverse the transfer of the wholesaler's
business;
(e) A wholesaler intentionally has made a transfer of his or her
business, other than a transfer to a designated member, although the
wholesaler has prior to the transfer received from the supplier a timely
notice of disapproval of the transfer in accordance with sections 53-201
to 53-223 and section 3 of this act; or
(f) The wholesaler intentionally ceases or ceases for a period of
more than thirty-one days to carry on business with respect to any of the
supplier's brand or brands previously serviced by a wholesaler in its
sales territory designated by the supplier unless such cessation is due
to a force beyond the control of the wholesaler or to a labor dispute and
the wholesaler has made good faith efforts to overcome such events. This
subdivision shall affect only that brand or brands with respect to which
the wholesaler ceased to carry on business.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (1), (3), (5), and (6) of this
section, a supplier may cancel, terminate, not renew, or discontinue an
agreement upon not less than thirty days' written notice if the supplier
discontinues production or discontinues distribution in this state of all
the brands sold by the supplier to the wholesaler. Nothing in this
section shall prohibit a supplier from (a) upon not less than thirty
days' written notice, discontinuing the distribution of any particular
brand or package of beer or (b) conducting test marketing of a new brand
-11-

LB1115 LB1115
2026 2026
of beer or of a brand of beer which is not currently being sold in this
state if the supplier has notified the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission
in writing of its plans to test market. The notice to the commission
shall describe the market area in which the test will be conducted, the
name or names of the wholesaler or wholesalers who will be selling the
beer, the name or names of the brand of beer being tested, and the period
of time, not to exceed eighteen months, during which the testing will
take place.
(8) Each wholesaler who sells beer to a retailer in this state shall
service for the purpose of quality control all the beer it sells to that
retailer. Each wholesaler shall, to the extent permitted by the Nebraska
Liquor Control Act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
pursuant to such act:
(a) Rotate the beer it sold to a retailer no less frequently than
may be specified from time to time by the brand owner so that beer
produced first will be sold first;
(b) Clean and maintain tap equipment and provide related services as
may be specified from time to time by the brand owner;
(c) Remove and replace with the same kind of beer any beer it sold
to a retailer which has not been resold to a consumer within the time
limits specified by the brand owner; and
(d) Provide whatever additional quality control services and comply
with whatever additional quality control requirements are specified in
writing from time to time by the brand owner, subject to the conditions
that those services and requirements are reasonable and are reasonably
related to promotion of quality control and that the wholesaler has
received written notice of the services to be provided and the
requirements to be satisfied and has been granted a reasonable time
within which to comply.
(9) Except in the event of a temporary service interruption, a
wholesaler shall not sell beer (a) to a retailer who does not have a
-12-

LB1115 LB1115
2026 2026
location within the wholesaler's sales territory at which the retailer is
entitled to resell beer to consumers or who the wholesaler knows or
reasonably should know does not have a location within the wholesaler's
sales territory at which the retailer is entitled to resell beer or (b)
to any person who the wholesaler has reason to believe will sell or
supply all or part of such beer to any retailer who does not have a
location within the wholesaler's sales territory at which the retailer is
entitled to resell beer. During a period of temporary service
interruption impacting a particular wholesaler's sales territory, the
wholesaler who normally services the sales territory shall file with the
Nebraska Liquor Control Commission and serve on his or her suppliers a
written notice stating that a temporary service interruption has occurred
and indicating the anticipated duration of the temporary service
interruption. After receiving such notice the supplier may designate
another wholesaler or wholesalers to service the sales territory during
the period of temporary service interruption. After the temporary service
interruption, the wholesaler who normally services the sales territory
shall file with the commission and serve on each wholesaler providing
temporary service and each supplier a written notice stating that the
temporary service interruption has ended. Each wholesaler providing
temporary service shall cease servicing the sales territory after
receiving such notice.
Sec. 8. Section 53-220, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-220 A supplier that, in violation of section 53-218 or 53-219,
(1) has amended, modified, canceled, terminated, or refused to renew any
agreement, (2) has caused a wholesaler to resign from an agreement, or
(3) has interfered with, prevented, or unreasonably delayed or, when
required by sections 53-201 to 53-223 and section 3 of this act, has
unreasonably withheld or unreasonably delayed consent to or approval of
any assignment or transfer of a wholesaler's business shall pay the
-13-

LB1115 LB1115
2026 2026
wholesaler reasonable compensation for the diminished value of the
wholesaler's business, including any ancillary business which has been
negatively affected by the act of the supplier. The value of the
wholesaler's business or ancillary business shall include, but not be
limited to, any goodwill. Nothing in such sections shall give rise to a
claim against the supplier or wholesaler by any proposed purchaser of the
wholesaler's business.
Sec. 9. Section 53-221, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-221 A wholesaler may not waive any of the rights granted in
sections 53-201 to 53-223 and section 3 of this act, and the provisions
of any agreement which would have such an effect shall be null and void.
Nothing in such sections shall be construed to limit or prohibit good
faith dispute settlements voluntarily entered into by the parties.
Sec. 10. Section 53-222, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-222 (1) Sections 53-201 to 53-223 and section 3 of this act shall
apply to agreements in existence on April 18, 1989, and agreements
entered into or renewed after such date.
(2) A transferee of a wholesaler that continues in business as a
wholesaler shall have the benefit of and be bound by all terms and
conditions of the agreement with the supplier in effect on the date of
the transfer. A transfer of a wholesaler's business which requires the
supplier's consent or approval but is disapproved by the supplier shall
be null and void.
(3) A successor to a supplier that continues in business as a
supplier shall be bound by all terms and conditions of each distribution
agreement that the predecessor was a party to at the time of transfer
with respect to each brand the successor continues to make available for
sale in this state.
Sec. 11. Section 53-223, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-14-

LB1115 LB1115
2026 2026
amended to read:
53-223 (1) If a supplier engages in conduct prohibited under
sections 53-201 to 53-223 and section 3 of this act, a wholesaler with
whom the supplier has an agreement may maintain a civil action against
the supplier to recover actual damages reasonably incurred as the result
of the prohibited conduct. If a wholesaler engages in conduct prohibited
under such sections, a supplier with whom the wholesaler has an agreement
may maintain a civil action against the wholesaler to recover actual
damages reasonably incurred as the result of the prohibited conduct.
(2) A supplier who violates any provision of such sections shall be
liable for all actual damages, all court costs, and, in the court's
discretion, reasonable attorney's fees incurred by a wholesaler as a
result of the violation. A wholesaler who violates any provision of such
sections shall be liable for all actual damages, all court costs, and, in
the court's discretion, reasonable attorney's fees incurred by the
supplier as a result of the violation.
(3) A supplier or wholesaler may bring an action for declaratory
judgment for determination of any controversy arising pursuant to such
sections.
(4) Upon proper application to the court, a supplier or wholesaler
may obtain injunctive relief against any violation of such sections. If
the court grants injunctive relief or issues a temporary restraining
order, bond shall be posted.
(5) The remedies provided by such sections are not exclusive, and
nothing contained in such sections shall abolish any cause of action or
remedy available to the supplier or the wholesaler existing on April 18,
1989.
(6) Any legal action taken under such sections or relating to a
dispute arising out of an agreement or breach thereof or over the
provisions of an agreement shall be filed in a state or federal court
located in Nebraska, which state court is located in, or which federal
-15-

LB1115 LB1115
2026 2026
court has jurisdiction and venue of, the county in which the wholesaler
maintains its principal place of business in this state.
Sec. 12. This act becomes operative on October 1, 2026.
Sec. 13. Original sections 53-201, 53-202, 53-213, 53-216, 53-217,
53-218, 53-220, 53-221, 53-222, and 53-223, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, are repealed.
-16-